Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2012
71-9001
Sexual assault or domestic violence
patient; examination and treatment authorized.

A physician, his or her agent, or a
mental health professional as defined in section 71-906, upon consultation
with a patient who is eighteen years of age, shall, with the consent of the
patient, make or cause to be made a diagnostic examination for physical or
mental injuries associated with sexual assault or domestic violence and prescribe
for and treat such person for injuries associated with sexual assault or domestic
violence. All such examinations and treatment may be performed without the
consent of or notification to the parent, parents, guardian, or any other
person having custody of the patient.

Laws 2011, LB479, § 2.